Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1799.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(5)(iv) of the act of April 3, 1992 (P.L.28, No.11), known as the Tuition Account Programs and College Savings Bond Act, is amended to read:Section 301. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 * * *(5) The purposes of this chapter are to:* * *(iv) Provide to the citizens of this Commonwealth means of saving for elementary, secondary and postsecondary education that provides them with the advantages of "qualified State tuition programs" as defined by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 529).Section 2. The definitions of "other educational expense credits" and "Tuition Account Program Contract" in section 302 of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible elementary or secondary educational institution." A day or residential school which provides kindergarten, elementary or secondary education in this Commonwealth, including both public and nonpublic schools, at which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of Article XIII of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1965 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.).* * *"Other educational expense credits." Tuition credits that are converted for payment of qualified higher education expenses 20250HB1799PN2213 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other than tuition for an eligible educational institution, as provided in section 309(h).* * *"Qualified education loan." Indebtedness on behalf of a beneficiary or sibling of a beneficiary to pay qualified higher education expenses as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 221(d)(2) (relating to interest on education loans) as of the time the indebtedness was incurred, which are:(1) paid or incurred within a reasonable period of time before or after the indebtedness is incurred; and(2) attributable to education furnished during a period during which the recipient was an eligible student.* * *"Registered apprenticeship program." An apprenticeship program registered and certified with the United States Secretary of Labor under 29 U.S.C. § 50 (relating to promotion of labor standards of apprenticeship)."Sibling." A brother, sister, stepbrother or stepsister.* * *"Tuition Account Program Contract." A Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Contract or a Tuition Account Investment Program Contract entered into by an account owner and the department to provide for savings to meet the future qualified [higher education expenses of a beneficiary attending an eligible educational institution] education expenses.* * *Section 3. Sections 303 and 305(4) of the act are amended to read:Section 303. Tuition Account Programs Bureau.The State Treasurer is directed to establish a bureau within 20250HB1799PN2213 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Treasury Department, which shall be known as the Tuition Account Programs Bureau, for the purpose of establishing and administering two programs for [postsecondary] educational savings, a guaranteed savings program for postsecondary education and an investment program for elementary, secondary and postsecondary education. The guaranteed savings program shall provide that money may be contributed pursuant to a Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Contract for the future payment of qualified higher educational expenses for attendance at eligible educational institutions as described in section 309. Money contributed pursuant to a Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Contract shall increase in value by, at a minimum, the increase in the tuition at the tuition level designated in the contract. The investment program shall provide that money may be contributed pursuant to a Tuition Account Program Investment Contract for the future payment of qualified [higher] educational expenses for attendance at eligible elementary or secondary educational institutions, or eligible educational institutions as described in section 309.1. The investment program shall have no guarantee. Money contributed pursuant to a Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Contract may be withdrawn for the payment of the following:(1) Qualified educational expenses.(2) Qualified education loans.(3) Fees, books and supplies for participation in a Registered Apprenticeship Program.(4) Attendance at an eligible elementary or secondary educational institution under section 309.Section 305. Powers of department.In addition to the powers granted by other provisions of this 20250HB1799PN2213 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter, the department shall have the powers necessary or convenient to carry out this chapter, including, but not limited to, the power to:* * *(4) Pay directly to an eligible educational institution or an eligible elementary or secondary educational institution, an account owner, a beneficiary or a third party authorized by the account owner, upon the receipt of appropriate documentation, the funds due pursuant to a Tuition Account Program Contract.* * *Section 4. Section 309 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 309. Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program.* * *(g.1) Conversion of tuition credits for use at eligible elementary or secondary educational institution.--Upon the request of the account holder, the department shall permit the use of tuition credits for the payment of qualified education expenses at eligible elementary or secondary educational institutions, subject to an appropriate conversion as determined by the department.(g.2) Conversion of tuition credits for repayment of qualified education loans.--Upon the request of an account holder, the department shall permit the use of tuition credits to repay qualified education loans, subject to appropriate conversion as determined by the department.(g.3) Conversion of tuition credits for use in registered apprenticeship program.--Upon the request of an account holder, the department shall permit the use of tuition credits to pay 20250HB1799PN2213 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fees, books and supplies for participation in a registered apprenticeship program, subject to an appropriate conversion as determined by the department.* * *Section 5. Sections 309.1, 309.2(b) and (d) and 317 of the act are amended to read:Section 309.1. Tuition Account Investment Program.The department shall establish an investment plan that defines the Tuition Account Investment Program structure and sets forth investment policies and guidelines to be utilized in administering the program and may, in its discretion, obtain the services of investment managers, program managers and trustees as described in section 307(b) to assist in establishing and administering the plan. The department, pursuant to a Tuition Account Investment Program Contract, shall specify the minimum and maximum amounts of contributions, the terms and conditions for transferring the Tuition Account Investment Program Contract to another account owner or substituting a beneficiary for the originally named beneficiary, the terms and conditions for withdrawing contributions or terminating the Tuition Account Investment Program Contract, the method and procedures for making payments pursuant to the Tuition Account Investment Program Contracts for the payment of beneficiaries' qualified [higher] education expenses and all other rights and obligations of the account owner and the department.Section 309.2. General provisions governing both tuition account programs.* * *(b) Period of participation.--Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, the following shall apply:20250HB1799PN2213 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a minimum period of one year must elapse between the time a contribution is made pursuant to a Tuition Account Program Contract and the time that contribution and any increase in its value may be used for payment of qualified [higher] education expenses pursuant to section 309 or 309.1.(2) The board may prescribe an alternative minimum period of time which must elapse between a contribution and its use for payment of qualified [higher] education expenses.* * *(d) Excess contributions.--The department shall institute adequate safeguards to prevent contributions to an account or multiple accounts that are in excess of those necessary to provide for the qualified [higher] education expenses of the beneficiary of that account or accounts, as specified in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 529).* * *Section 317. Federal taxation.The department may take appropriate action in order to obtain a determination from the Internal Revenue Service or the Federal courts as to whether contributions made pursuant to a Tuition Account Program Contract, the increase in value of such contributions and payment of qualified [higher] education expenses pursuant to a Tuition Account Program Contract shall be a transaction which will subject account owners or the income of either or both of the funds to Federal taxation and may respond to such determination in any manner permitted under this chapter.Section 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:20250HB1799PN2213 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 320. Keystone Scholars Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a grant program as part of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund established under section 306 to be known as the Keystone Scholars Grant Program. The purpose of the program shall be to promote access to postsecondary educational opportunities for each eligible child.(b) Administration.--(1) No later than 90 days following the birth of an eligible child, the Department of Health shall transmit information and record data to the department necessary to administer the program and establish the eligibility of each child born after December 31, 2018. Information under this subsection shall include record data, such as the full name and residential address of the child's parent or legal guardian and birth date of the child.(2) Following receipt of the information under paragraph (1), the department shall notify each parent or guardian of each eligible child about the program.(3) The department shall provide an opportunity to be excluded from the program.(4) The department shall ensure the security and confidentiality of the information and record data provided under paragraph (1).(c) Keystone Scholars Grant Program Account.--(1) The Keystone Scholars Grant Program Account is established as a separate account within the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund. Money contained in the account shall be for the exclusive purpose of providing scholarship grants to eligible children to pay for qualified 20250HB1799PN2213 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 higher education expenses associated with the attendance at an eligible educational institution.(2) The following apply to allocations and actuarial status:(i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii) and (iii), at the end of each fiscal year, assets of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund that are in excess of 10% of the actuarially determined liabilities of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund shall be allocated to the account.(ii) Annual allocations under subparagraph (i) may not exceed an amount equal to $100 multiplied by the number of children born in this Commonwealth in the fiscal year.(iii) An allocation under subparagraph (i) may not be made if the allocation would cause the actuarially determined surplus of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund to fall below 10% of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund's actuarially determined liabilities.(iv) The department may invest and reinvest money in the account as provided for under section 307.(v) Annually, the State Treasurer shall report to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives the actuarial status of the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund as required under section 306(b)(2).(vi) This paragraph shall expire December 31, 2030.20250HB1799PN2213 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Money in the account shall be used for the purpose of providing grants for qualified higher education expenses associated with the attendance at an eligible educational institution and for costs associated with the administration of the program. Costs associated with the administration of the program shall be reported to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives in the same manner as required under paragraph (2)(v).(d) Amount of grant.--To an eligible child for whom a Tuition Account Program Contract has been entered into, and upon application and the submission of documentation necessary to establish the child's eligibility and enrollment as a student at an eligible educational institution, the department shall provide a scholarship grant in the amount of $100, plus investment earnings attributed to the initial grant amount since the birth date of the eligible child as calculated by the department, for qualified higher education expenses associated with attendance at an eligible educational institution.(e) Availability of account balances.--The department shall make program account balances available to each parent or guardian of an eligible child through a secured Internet account.(f) Authorization of annual match of contributions.--(1) Subject to the availability of money under subsection (g), the State Treasurer may establish an annual match of contributions made by a parent or guardian of an eligible child into an established Guaranteed Savings Plan 20250HB1799PN2213 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Account under section 309.(2) Subject to the availability of money from contributions made under subsection (g), the State Treasurer may establish financial incentives, such as school attendance, for additional grants for an eligible child with an established Guaranteed Savings Plan Account under section 309.(3) Money from the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund may not be used for purposes under paragraphs (1) and (2).(g) Contributions from persons and entities.-- Notwithstanding subsection (c)(2)(iii), the department may receive contributions from a person or legal entity to the account on behalf of, and make grants to, eligible children to pay for qualified higher education expenses associated with attendance at an eligible educational institution.(h) Monitoring of program by board.--In addition to the duties under section 304, the board shall consider, study and review the work of the program, advise the department on request and make recommendations for the improvement of the program.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Keystone Scholars Grant Program Account established under subsection (c)."Eligible child." An individual born after December 31, 2018, who is less than 29 years of age and is:(1) a resident of this Commonwealth at the time of birth and at the time that the grant for qualified higher education expenses is applied for or received; or20250HB1799PN2213 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) an adoptee in receipt of a valid decree of adoption under 23 Pa.C.S. § 2902 (relating to requirements and form of decree of adoption), whose adopting parent or parents were residents of this Commonwealth at the time the decree of adoption was entered and who is a resident at the time that the grant for qualified higher education expenses is applied for or received."Program." The Keystone Scholars Grant Program established under subsection (a).Section 7. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly finds and declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate this act.(2) Section 312 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1799PN2213 - 12 - 12345678910111213141516